Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 8 Retirement Of Judges And Court Employees
24-8-302. Board of trustees.

There is created in cities of the first class or cities of the second class a board of trustees which shall consist of the mayor, city clerk, city treasurer, city health officer, and municipal judges of the city.

The board shall receive and administer the funds collected under the provisions of this subchapter and shall have the power to make necessary rules therefor.

The board shall have the authority to invest such funds as are not necessary for immediate use for payment of retirement benefits in interest-bearing securities of the State of Arkansas or certificates of the United States or any or all such securities.

Subject to subdivision (c)(3) of this section, a city having a municipal judges' and clerks' pension plan with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall have full power to invest and reinvest the moneys of the plan and to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the investments so made, as well as the proceeds of the investments and moneys. Such authority shall be implemented by the mayor and the city treasurer.

The investments and reinvestments shall be made only in accordance with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-3-417 — 24-3-426 [repealed].

A city having a municipal judges' and clerks' pension plan with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may employ an investment advisor as its agent to make investment recommendations and to invest the assets pursuant to a written board investment policy, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon investments of state retirement systems, as set forth in §§ 24-3-417 — 24-3-426 [repealed].

The investment policy shall not limit the investments to interest-bearing bonds.

A city, mayor, or city treasurer who complies with the requirements of § 24-3-425(a) [repealed] is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting the delegation of a trust function from the trustees of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

The city treasurer shall be the treasurer of the board. At the direction of the board, he or she shall deposit the funds paid into the board in some suitable depository and shall draw and sign all necessary checks at the direction of the board.

He or she shall execute a bond in a sum fixed by the board to guarantee his or her good faith in the handling of the funds coming into his or her hands under the provisions of this subchapter.

The city clerk shall be the secretary of the board.

The board shall constitute one (1) of its members as chair, who shall serve for a period of two (2) years.

Meetings of the board may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members in a manner established by the board.

The city clerk shall receive the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) for each and every meeting attended but shall not be paid more than fifty dollars ($50.00) in any one (1) year.

All other members shall serve without pay.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 7; 1983, No. 845, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-920; Acts 1995, No. 514, § 1; 1999, No. 49, § 1; 1999, No. 330, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subdivision (d)(2) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

24-8-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning source and collection of funds, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 432, §§ 6, 8; 1975, No. 883, § 1; 1983, No. 187, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-919, 22-921; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 99, § 1; 1991, No. 904, §§ 16, 20; 1993, No. 162, § 1; 1995, No. 918, § 1; 1995, No. 1002, § 1; 1995, No. 1241, § 1. For present law, see §§ 16-10-308, 24-8-317, and 24-8-318.

24-8-304. Benefits — Frequency of payment — Deficiencies.

All payments of retirement benefits under this subchapter shall be payable semimonthly.

In case the fund established by this subchapter should ever become deficient to pay retirement benefits due any persons under this subchapter, the city treasurer shall verify the deficiency.

This deficiency shall be met by payment from the general funds of the city and proportionately from the general funds of the county if the salary of the judge of the municipal courts in the county is paid partially by the county, in such amount as may be necessary to continue the timely payment of retirement benefits to the persons entitled thereto.

If funds thereafter accruing under this subchapter accumulate to become sufficient for the payment of benefits, then no further payment shall be made from the general funds of the city unless and until the fund provided by this subchapter should again become deficient and the deficiency is verified by the city treasurer.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-918.

24-8-305. Entitlement to benefits generally.

Any judge, licensed to practice law, of a municipal court established in any county and any clerk of such a municipal court appointed by the judges thereof shall be entitled to the benefits prescribed in this subchapter for such judges and clerks.

Any judge of a municipal court who is not licensed to practice law shall be entitled to the benefits prescribed in § 24-8-310.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 1; 1981, No. 410, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-914.

24-8-306. Eligibility for benefits — Regular and disability retirement — Surviving Spouses' rights.

A judge of a municipal court upon reaching age sixty-eight (68) and having served for a minimum of seven (7) years immediately prior to retirement may retire.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during any term for which a judge has been elected, he or she shall be eligible to retire.

The retirement benefits to be paid to the retiree shall be equal to one-half (½) of the salary being paid at the time of retirement for and during his or her natural life.

Notice of retirement under any provision of this subchapter shall be in writing and sent to the chair of the board of trustees who, upon finding that the applicant meets the requirements for retirement, shall authorize the secretary of the board to issue vouchers in payment to the applicant in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter for and during the natural life of the applicant.

Upon the death of a judge receiving, or eligible to receive, retirement benefits under this subchapter, leaving a surviving spouse, there shall be paid to the surviving spouse for the remainder of his or her natural life, or until he or she remarries, benefits equal to one-half (½) of the retirement benefits which the deceased judge was receiving, or would have been eligible to receive, at the time of his or her death.

Upon the death of a judge while serving in that capacity, leaving a surviving spouse who has been married to and living with the judge for at least five (5) years immediately preceding his or her death, that surviving spouse, if not remarried prior thereto, shall, upon reaching age fifty (50), be entitled to and shall receive, until his or her death or remarriage, benefits in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the retirement benefits to which the deceased judge would have been entitled had he or she been eligible for retirement on the date of his or her death.

Upon the death of a municipal judge, while serving in that capacity, in a county which is authorized by the Arkansas Constitution to have two (2) districts and two (2) county seats, and who has served as a municipal judge of the court for a minimum of fifteen (15) years, leaving a surviving spouse who had been married to, and living with, the judge for at least fifteen (15) years immediately preceding his or her death, the surviving spouse, if not remarried prior thereto, shall, upon reaching age forty-seven (47), be eligible to apply for, and shall receive until his or her death or remarriage, benefits as authorized in this subdivision (d)(3) in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the retirement benefits to which the deceased judge would have been entitled had he or she been eligible for retirement on the date of his or her death.

This subdivision (d)(3) shall apply to all such municipal judges now serving, or who shall serve in the future, or who have served as such during the five-year period immediately prior to March 5, 1985, who have accumulated fifteen (15) years of service as a municipal judge and who meet the other requirements of this subdivision (d)(3).

This subdivision (d)(3) shall not apply to any retirement funds which are administered by the state, nor shall any surviving spouse be entitled to the benefits provided by this subdivision (d)(3) unless the payment of the benefits has been approved by both the governing body of the city wherein the municipal court sits and the quorum court of the county wherein the municipal court sits.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 2; 1977, No. 721, § 1; 1985, No. 265, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-915.

24-8-307. Eligibility for benefits — Cities of the first class or cities of the second class.

Upon the approval of a majority of the city council or the board of directors of a city of the first class or a city of the second class, and of the county quorum court if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any judge of a municipal court to which this subchapter applies who shall attain age fifty (50) and who shall have served at least sixteen (16) years in office as municipal judge shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality and of the county quorum court if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any judge of a municipal court who shall attain age seventy (70) or over, who shall have served at least six (6) elective years in office as municipal judge, and who has served not less than two (2) or more elective years as a prosecuting attorney and as an Attorney General of the State of Arkansas shall be entitled to receive benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter.

Upon approval of the governing body of the municipality and of the county quorum court if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any judge of a municipal court who shall attain age seventy-eight (78) or over, who shall have served at least four (4) years in office as municipal judge, and who has become disabled while serving as municipal judge shall be entitled to receive benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter.

Any municipal judge receiving retirement benefits under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be eligible to receive retirement benefits under the provisions of §§ 24-8-401 and 24-8-403 — 24-8-408 in addition thereto.

Upon the approval of a majority of the city council or board of directors of a city of the first class or a city of the second class, any person who shall attain age fifty (50), and who shall have served two (2) or more years as an elected justice of the peace and three (3) or more years as a certified full-time law enforcement officer, and who has held the office of municipal judge not fewer than ten (10) years shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during the final term for qualification under these provisions, then the judge so elected shall be eligible to retire at one-half (½) pay as provided in this section.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the qualifying judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter until his or her death or remarriage.

Upon the approval of a majority of the city council or board of directors of a city of the first class or a city of the second class and the approval of the quorum court of the county, any person shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter who:

At age fifty-five (55) has sixteen (16) years of service with not fewer than eight (8) years as municipal judge and at least five (5) years as a deputy prosecuting attorney and three (3) years with any state agency for a total of sixteen (16) years; or

At age fifty (50) has at least ten (10) years of service as municipal judge and at least ten (10) years of service as a juvenile referee for a total of twenty (20) years of service.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to the judge at the time of resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during the final term for qualification under these provisions, then the judge so elected shall be eligible to retire at one-half (½) pay as provided in this section.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the qualifying judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter until the surviving spouse's death or remarriage.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality and of the county quorum court, if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any judge of a municipal court or county municipal court who shall attain age sixty-two (62) and who shall have served at least sixteen (16) years in office as municipal judge, or at least sixteen (16) years combined service as municipal judge, deputy prosecuting attorney, assistant attorney general, or city attorney shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subsection.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement pay for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount, approved by the governing body or governing bodies, equal to not less than thirty-five percent (35%) nor more than fifty percent (50%) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

Any municipal judge who retires under this subsection shall be entitled to continue to participate in and be covered by the city/county health insurance program.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality and of the county quorum court, if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any person who has sixteen (16) or more years of public service, with not less than twelve (12) years as municipal judge and at least four (4) years of other public service as a state trooper, as deputy prosecuting attorney, and with active duty in the military aggregated together for a total of sixteen (16) years or more at public service, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during the final term for qualification under these provisions, then the judge so elected shall be eligible to retire at one-half (½) pay as provided in this section.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the qualifying judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter until his or her death or remarriage.

Upon the approval of a majority of the city council or board of directors of a city of the first class or a city of the second class and the approval of the quorum court of the county, if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any person who at age fifty (50) has sixteen (16) years of service, with not less than eight (8) years as municipal judge and at least six (6) years as a prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney and two (2) years with any state agency for a total of sixteen (16) years, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during the final term of qualification under these provisions, then the judge so elected shall be eligible to retire at one-half (½) pay as provided in this section.

In addition thereto, the surviving spouse of the qualifying judge shall be entitled to the benefits provided in this subchapter until his or her death or remarriage.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 3; 1975, No. 392, § 1; 1977, No. 939, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-916; Acts 1993, No. 239, § 1; 1995, No. 792, § 1; 1997, No. 1322, § 1; 2001, No. 1613, § 1.

24-8-308. Eligibility for benefits — Twenty years of service.

Any judge of a municipal court to which this subchapter applies who shall have served at least twenty (20) years in office as municipal judge, irrespective of age, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during the final term of qualifications under these provisions, then the judge so elected shall be eligible at one-half (½) pay as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

On the death of a municipal judge leaving a surviving spouse who had been married to and living with the judge for at least ten (10) years, the surviving spouse shall be eligible to apply for and shall receive until his or her death or remarriage, benefits as authorized in this subdivision (a)(3) in an amount equal to one-half (½) the retirement benefits to which the deceased judge would have been entitled on the date of his or her death.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 4; 1985, No. 1080, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-917; Acts 1999, No. 1329, § 1.

24-8-309. Eligibility for benefits — Sixteen years of service as judge and city attorney.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality and of the county quorum court if county funds are used to partially pay the salary of the judge of the municipal court, any judge of a municipal court who has served or who shall serve at least twelve (12) years in office as municipal judge and who has also served four (4) years or more as city attorney in the same city shall, upon attaining age sixty-five (65), receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 4; 1985, No. 1080, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-917.

24-8-310. Eligibility for benefits — Judge unlicensed to practice law.

Any judge of a municipal court who is not licensed to practice law, who has served at least twenty (20) years as municipal judge or police judge, and who resigns, retires, or is succeeded in office shall receive retirement benefits upon attaining age sixty (60).

These benefits shall continue for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-fourth (¼) of the salary payable to him or her at the time he or she resigned, retired, or was succeeded in office.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 4; 1981, No. 410, § 2; 1985, No. 1080, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-917.

24-8-311. Eligibility for benefits — Clerks.

Any clerk of a municipal court to which this subchapter applies, appointed by the judges of the court, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter who:

Attains age sixty (60) and has served in office as clerk for at least ten (10) years; or

Has served in office for at least twenty (20) years irrespective of age.

If the clerk resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another clerk, the clerk shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to the clerk at the time of resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

After the death of the clerk, the surviving spouse of a qualifying court clerk shall be entitled to continue to receive the retirement benefits under this subchapter until the surviving spouse dies or remarries.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality and following a determination of the actuarial soundness of the fund from which the benefits shall be paid, any court clerk of a municipal court who upon reaching age sixty-eight (68) will have served for a minimum of seven (7) years immediately prior to severance from employment may retire with a reduced benefit in an amount equal to seven-tenths (0.7) of the benefits payable under subsection (a) of this section.

The board of trustees by resolution may provide retirement benefits to a clerk who is incapacitated due to illness or disability and has served for a minimum of seven (7) years.

The clerk may retire with a reduced benefit in an amount equal to seven-tenths (0.7) of the benefits payable under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 4; 1985, No. 1080, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-917; Acts 1989, No. 714, § 1; 1991, No. 499, § 1; 2001, No. 1613, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 499, § 2, provided that the act shall apply retroactively to January 1, 1990.

24-8-312. Right of transfer from or purchase of credit in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or reciprocal system.

A judge of a municipal court and a clerk of a municipal court who, on March 23, 1973, were covered by the provisions of the Municipal Section of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall, prior to January 1, 1982, make an election in writing as to whether to continue as a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in lieu of participating in the retirement benefits in this subchapter.

In the event any such municipal judge or municipal court clerk shall elect to receive retirement benefits under this subchapter, they shall cease to be members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

In the case of all municipal judges and municipal court clerks who elected, in the manner provided in this subchapter, to receive retirement benefits under the provisions of this subchapter in lieu of benefits provided as a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, all contributions paid by the municipal judge or the municipal court clerk and all employer matching contributions paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in behalf of the municipal judge or the municipal court clerk shall be remitted, upon written request therefor by the board of trustees, as established in § 24-8-302 by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System from the employer and employee accounts of the Municipal Section of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund to the board of trustees.

Upon receipt of the contributions, the board of trustees shall deposit the contributions in the fund established for the payment of retirement benefits to retired municipal judges and municipal court clerks in the city as provided in this subchapter.

Any municipal court clerk or former municipal court clerk who was covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System at the time of the municipal service or was eligible for coverage at that time who withdrew the service and the accumulated contributions to the system and who later becomes a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or of a reciprocal system shall, upon meeting the requirements prescribed in this subsection, be entitled to have the time of complete municipal service restored to his or her credit.

In order for the member of the system or of the reciprocal system to be eligible to have the service credit restored, the member:

Shall not be currently receiving benefits under the system or a reciprocal system;

Shall be entitled to purchase no more than ten (10) years for the service rendered by the member as a municipal court clerk;

Shall have at least ten (10) years' credited service with the system or a reciprocal system at the time of the purchase;

Shall not have received credited service in the system or a reciprocal system in another state-supported retirement system or in a retirement system of the city in which the member was employed for the time period for which credit is being sought; and

Contributes to the members' deposit account a sum of money equal to the amount he or she, and if the employer contributions were returned, the amount the employer, would have contributed to the account had he or she been a member of the system or a reciprocal system during the period of service with the municipal court for which the member is establishing credit. This amount shall be based upon his or her, and if the employer contributions were returned, the employer's, monthly contribution at the time of the member's service with the municipal court for which the member is establishing credit and interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%) with interest compounded annually.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 9; 1981, No. 62, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-922; Acts 1995, No. 1242, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 99, § 2, provides:

“Notwithstanding the provisions of Ark. Code § 24-8-301 et seq., any city whose population was greater than 1,500 but less than 1,700 as reported in the 1980 Federal Decennial Census which has a municipal court established by law after January 1, 1977, but prior to January 1, 1978, which has made contributions to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System on behalf of its clerk of the municipal court prior to the effective date of this Act may continue to participate in Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and to make such contributions on behalf of its clerk and the clerk shall be entitled to retirement benefits from the Public Employees Retirement System only.”

The Municipal Section of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

24-8-313. Vote to pay benefits to certain clerks and spouses of judges.

Upon a three-fourths (¾) vote of the board of trustees established under § 24-8-302, the fund established under § 24-8-301 et seq. may pay retirement benefits due the following persons:

Former municipal court clerks who retired under retirement laws effective prior to March 23, 1973, and whose retirement benefits were paid from the city general fund; and

The surviving spouse of a municipal judge who retired under retirement laws effective prior to March 23, 1973, and whose retirement benefits were paid from the city general fund.

This section shall not repeal existing laws of this state relating to the retirement of municipal court judges and municipal court clerks but shall be cumulative to those laws. It shall in no manner affect the right or status of persons receiving or eligible to receive retirement benefits under § 24-8-301 et seq. or under retirement laws effective prior to March 23, 1973.

In case the fund established by § 24-8-301 et seq. should ever be or become deficient to pay retirement benefits due any person or persons under § 24-8-301 et seq. and those benefits due under this section, the treasurer of the board of trustees shall verify the deficiency, which shall be met by payment from the general funds of the city and proportionately from the general funds of the county if the salary of the judge and the clerk is paid partially by the county until such time as the fund accumulates funds sufficient to pay benefits.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 641, §§ 1-3.

24-8-314. Municipal judge filling partial term, etc.

Any judge of a municipal court who was elected countywide to a partial term left vacant by the death of the former judge and who shall have completed the same and subsequently shall have been elected to and completed four (4) consecutive four-year terms and shall at the time of his or her retirement have attained age fifty (50), upon retirement shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her retirement.

Upon his or her death, his or her surviving spouse shall be entitled for the remainder of his or her natural life, or until he or she remarries, benefits equal to one-half (½) of the retirement benefits which the deceased judge was receiving at the time of his or her death.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 873, § 4.

24-8-315. Multicounty districts — Options.

The quorum court of any county which is divided into two (2) districts and has two (2) county seats and in which the municipal court is funded primarily by the county shall have the option to provide retirement benefits for the municipal court judge and the municipal court clerk under a local retirement plan provided for in § 24-8-301 et seq. or to include the municipal court judge and municipal court clerk in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

In any county which is divided into two (2) districts and has two (2) county seats and in which the municipal court is funded primarily by the county, the quorum court is authorized to create a municipal court retirement board of trustees.

The board shall be composed of the county judge, county treasurer, county clerk, the mayor of the city in which the municipal court sits, the judge of the municipal court, and one (1) member of the quorum court that represents the service district in which the municipal court sits to be designated by the county judge.

The members of the board shall serve without pay.

The county judge shall be chairman of the board, the county clerk shall be secretary of the board, and the county treasurer shall be treasurer of the board.

The county treasurer, as treasurer of the board, shall deposit such funds as the board shall direct in a suitable depository and shall withdraw such funds on direction of the board.

The treasurer shall execute a bond in a sum fixed by the board to guarantee his or her good faith in the handling of the funds coming to his or her hands under the provisions of this section.

The board shall meet one (1) time each year, and special meetings may be called by the chairman or a majority of the members at any time.

The board shall have the authority and duty to receive and administer the funds collected in the county under § 24-8-303 [repealed] and under subsection (e) of this section [repealed].

The board shall have authority to invest such funds as are not necessary for immediate use for payment of retirement benefits in interest-bearing securities of the State of Arkansas or certificates of the United States, or any or all of such securities.

[Repealed.]

Any county employer or municipal employer participating in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that is required by law to establish a local retirement plan for any employee shall have the option at the time of employment or at any time thereafter to provide retirement benefits for the employee under the local retirement plan or to include the employee in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. However, a municipality participating in the system or a municipality electing at some future date to participate in the system may not transfer a municipal court judge or municipal court clerk from a local plan to the system without the express permission of the affected municipal court judge or municipal court clerk.

The decision to enroll the employee in the system in lieu of a local retirement plan shall be made by the employer's governing body and the results certified to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. The employer shall also certify that the employee has not received and will not be eligible to receive a benefit from a local retirement plan.

Upon enrollment in the system, the member may receive credit at his or her option for the service rendered in the position prior to enrollment, subject to the following conditions:

The member is a participating employee covered under the system at the time of the purchase;

The member furnishes proof in a form required by the system of the service and compensation received;

The member pays or causes to be paid all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system. The member may purchase all of the service or any portion thereof in multiples of one (1) year; and

The payment shall be made in one (1) lump sum.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 851, §§ 1-6; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 1; 1995, No. 1256, § 20; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4; 1999, No. 1066, § 4.

24-8-316. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning fees in lieu of levy, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 21, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1346, § 1.

24-8-317. Funding for retirement benefits.

After the repeal of § 24-8-303 providing for the levy of court costs to fund the municipal court judge and clerk retirement fund, a municipality having provided for retirement benefits for municipal court judges and court clerks in accordance with this subchapter shall continue to provide funds for the retirement benefits in that subchapter in accordance with the funding provisions of § 16-10-308(a)-(d), as long as those provisions allow.

Those funds and any additional funds provided for by this section and § 24-8-318, if levied by the municipality, shall be to provide for the retirement benefits in that subchapter.

The funds for the municipal court judge and clerk retirement fund provided for by § 16-10-308(a)-(d) and any additional funds for municipal court judge and court clerk retirement benefits provided for by this section and § 24-8-318, if levied by the municipality, shall be paid to the city treasurer, who shall place them into an account as provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 571, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-301, 24-8-302, 24-8-304 — 24-8-312, 24-8-314, and 24-8-319 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-8-318. Additional funding sources for retirement benefits.

In addition to the funds for the municipal court judges and clerk retirement fund provided for by § 16-10-308(a)-(d), if the city council or quorum court determines by actuarial valuation that funding is inadequate to meet the financial objective of paying for current and any projected retirement funding obligations, a municipality or county may also add to retirement funding by city ordinance or county ordinance any or all of the following moneys:

Up to five percent (5%) of all fines and forfeitures collected by the district court or by the city or county for violations of municipal ordinances, county ordinances, or state laws.

This five percent (5%) shall not be taken from:

Court costs collected; and

Fines and forfeitures collected for violations of state laws that are designated by law as payable to state agencies or entities;

An annual contribution from the city's general fund in an amount recommended by actuarial valuation to meet its projected financial obligation; and

A one-time or occasional lump-sum payment from the city's general fund in an amount determined by the city's governing body, along with any payments or contributions from the county when the city and county share expenses and costs of a countywide court.

All ordinances passed pursuant to this section shall remain in full force and effect.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 571, § 2; 2003, No. 1765, § 31; 2005, No. 1920, § 1; 2007, No. 177, § 11.

24-8-319. Benefits.

Any person participating in a retirement plan authorized under this subchapter on or after July 1, 1999, shall be entitled to a retirement benefit if that person has ten (10) or more years of actual service in a plan covered by this subchapter and is at least sixty (60) years of age. If the person does not have sufficient service to draw the full benefit provided, then a partial benefit not to exceed the full benefit shall be payable when the person has reached the age requirement specified in this subchapter. The partial benefit shall be determined by multiplying the full benefit by the following fraction:

The numerator shall be the number of months of actual service under the provisions of this subchapter; and

The denominator shall be two hundred forty (240) months.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 1.